West Virginia, session 2026, SB453.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-98. Tax deduction for medical payments; rules established. (a) Establishment of tax deduction. – All payments by an individual of medical premiums, payment of medicine, visits to medical providers, mileage to and from medical providers, and copay payments for medical insurance shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this article.(b) Rules. — The Tax Commissioner may promulgate such interpretive, legislative, and procedural rules as the commissioner deems to be useful or necessary to carry out the purpose of this section and to implement the intent of the Legislature. The Tax Commissioner may promulgate emergency rules pursuant to the provisions of §29A-3-15 of this code